sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Vzpieračské rukavice a chrániče rúk: Úchopové podložky a rukoväte; Vzpieračské rukavice; Vzpieračské pruhy; Zápästné bandáže na zdvíhanie závaží
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Vektløftingshansker og håndstøtter: Gripeputer og håndgrep; Vektløftingshansker; Løftestropper; Håndleddsbind for vektløfting
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Ръкавици и опори за ръце за вдигане на тежести: Подложки и ръкохватки за захват; Ръкавици за вдигане на тежести; Каишки за вдигане на тежести; Бинтове за китки за вдигане на тежести
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Träningshandskar och handstöd: Greppkuddar och handskar; Träningshandskar för tyngdlyftning; Dragremmar; Handledslindor för tyngdlyftning
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Mănuși și suporturi pentru mâini pentru ridicat greutăți: Pernuțe și prinderi pentru mână; Mănuși de haltere; Curele de haltere; Bandaje de încheietură pentru haltere
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Guantes y soportes de mano para levantar pesas: Almohadillas de agarre y agarraderas; Guantes para levantamiento de pesas; Correas para levantamiento de pesas; Muñequeras para levantamiento de pesas
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > ウェイトリフティング用グローブ: グリップパッド・ハンドグリップ; ウェイトリフティング用グローブ; ウェイトリフティング用ストラップ; ウェイトリフティング用リストラップ
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Găng tay tập tạ & hỗ trợ tay: Miếng lót tay & bảo vệ bàn tay; Găng tay tập tạ; Dây kéo lưng tập tạ; Băng quấn cổ tay tập tạ
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Painonnostohanskat ja käsituet: Otepehmusteet ja -tuet; Painonnostohanskat; Vetoremmit; Painonnoston rannetuet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Rokavice in opore za roke za dvigovanje uteži: Oprijemne blazinice in ročaji; Rokavice za dvigovanje uteži; Trakovi za dvigovanje uteži; Zapestni trakovi za dvigovanje uteži
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Перчатки и кистевые бинты для тяжелой атлетики: Гимнастические накладки и грипы; Перчатки для фитнеса и тяжелой атлетики; Лямки для тяги; Кистевые бинты для тяжелой атлетики
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 举重手套/扶手: 握力护垫与防滑护手; 举重手套; 举重助力带; 举重护腕带
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Gewichtheberhandschuhe & Handgelenkschoner: Grip-Pads & Hand-Grips; Gewichtheberhandschuhe; Zughilfen; Handgelenkbandagen fürs Gewichtheben
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 舉重手套/助握帶: 護掌與護具; 舉重手套; 舉重拉力帶; 舉重護腕帶
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Handsker og håndstøtter til vægtløftning: Grebspuder og håndgreb; Træningshandsker til vægtløftning; Løftestropper; Håndledsbind til vægtløftning
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Vzpěračské rukavice: Gripy a mozolníky; Rukavice na cvičení; Trhačky; Bandáže na zápěstí
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Gants d’haltérophilie et accessoires pour les mains: Maniques et coussinets de protection; Gants d’haltérophilie; Sangles de tirage; Bandes de poignet pour haltérophilie
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Suportes de mãos e luvas para halterofilismo: Almofadas e pegas de mão; Luvas de musculação; Correias de musculação; Fitas de pulso de musculação
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Γάντια & υποστηρίγματα χεριών για άρση βαρών: Μαξιλαράκια και λαβές χεριών; Γάντια άρσης βαρών; Ιμάντες άρσης βαρών; Περικάρπια άρσης βαρών
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Handschoenen en -steunen voor gewichtheffen: Grippads en handgrips; Gewichthefhandschoenen; Lifting straps; Wrist wraps voor gewichtheffen
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Sunkiosios atletikos pirštinės ir rankų sutvirtinimo priemonės: Sukibimo pagalvėlės ir rankų griebtuvai; Svarmenų kilnojimo pirštinės; Svarmenų kilnojimo dirželiai; Svorio kilnojimo riešų tvarsčiai
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Súlyemelő kesztyűk és kéztámaszok: Tapadásnövelő párnák és markolatok; Súlyemelő kesztyűk; Súlyemelő gurtnik; Súlyemelő csuklószorítók
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > ถุงมือและที่รองมือสำหรับการยกน้ำหนัก: แผ่นรองและกริปจับยกน้ำหนัก; ถุงมือยกน้ำหนัก; สายรัดข้อมือยกน้ำหนัก; ผ้าพันข้อมือยกน้ำหนัก
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Rękawice i uchwyty do podnoszenia ciężarów: Pady i uchwyty gimnastyczne; Rękawice do podnoszenia ciężarów; Paski do podnoszenia ciężarów; Usztywniacze nadgarstków do podnoszenia ciężarów
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Guanti e polsiere per sollevamento pesi: Cuscinetti e protezioni per la presa; Guanti da sollevamento pesi; Cinghie per sollevamento pesi; Fasce per polsi per sollevamento pesi
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Rukavice za dizanje utega i oslonci za ruke: Držači i rukohvati; Rukavice za dizanje utega; Remeni za dizanje utega; Zavoji za zglobove za dizanje utega
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Ağırlık Kaldırma Eldivenleri ve El Destekleri: Kavrama pedleri ve tutacakları; Ağırlık eldivenleri; Ağırlık kaldırma kayışları; Ağırlık kaldırma bilek sargıları
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Weight Lifting Gloves & Hand Supports: Grip Pads & Hand Grips; Weight Lifting Gloves; Weight Lifting Straps; Weight Lifting Wrist Wraps
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 역기 운동용 장갑/손목 보호대: 그립 패드 및 핸드 그립; 웨이트 리프팅 장갑; 웨이트 리프팅 스트랩; 웨이트 리프팅 손목 랩
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Luvas de levantamento de peso: Pads de aderência e hand grips; Luvas de levantamento de peso; Straps para levantamento de peso; Faixas de pulso para levantamento de peso